Illinois, session 104th, SB1673.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Sections 6z-18 and 6z-20 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-18)  (from Ch. 127, par. 142z-18)7    Sec. 6z-18. Local Government Tax Fund. A portion of the 8money paid into the Local Government Tax Fund from sales of 9tangible personal property taxed at the 1% rate under the 10Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and the Service Occupation Tax 11Act, which occurred in municipalities, shall be distributed to 12each municipality based upon the sales which occurred in that 13municipality. The remainder shall be distributed to each 14county based upon the sales which occurred in the 15unincorporated area of that county.16    Moneys transferred from the Grocery Tax Replacement Fund 17to the Local Government Tax Fund under Section 6z-130 shall be 18treated under this Section in the same manner as if they had 19been remitted with the return on which they were reported. 20    A portion of the money paid into the Local Government Tax 21Fund from the 6.25% general use tax rate on the selling price 22of tangible personal property which is purchased outside 23Illinois at retail from a retailer and which is titled or   SB1673- 2 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1registered by any agency of this State's government shall be 2distributed to municipalities as provided in this paragraph. 3Each municipality shall receive the amount attributable to 4sales for which Illinois addresses for titling or registration 5purposes are given as being in such municipality. The 6remainder of the money paid into the Local Government Tax Fund 7from such sales shall be distributed to counties. Each county 8shall receive the amount attributable to sales for which 9Illinois addresses for titling or registration purposes are 10given as being located in the unincorporated area of such 11county.12    A portion of the money paid into the Local Government Tax 13Fund from the 6.25% general rate (and, beginning July 1, 2000 14and through December 31, 2000, the 1.25% rate on motor fuel and 15gasohol, and beginning on August 6, 2010 through August 15, 162010, and beginning again on August 5, 2022 through August 14, 172022, and beginning again from August 6, 2025 through August 1811, 2025, and from August 13, 2025 through August 15, 2025, the 191.25% rate on sales tax holiday items) on sales subject to 20taxation under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and the 21Service Occupation Tax Act, which occurred in municipalities, 22shall be distributed to each municipality, based upon the 23sales which occurred in that municipality. The remainder shall 24be distributed to each county, based upon the sales which 25occurred in the unincorporated area of such county.26    For the purpose of determining allocation to the local   SB1673- 3 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1government unit, a retail sale by a producer of coal or other 2mineral mined in Illinois is a sale at retail at the place 3where the coal or other mineral mined in Illinois is extracted 4from the earth. This paragraph does not apply to coal or other 5mineral when it is delivered or shipped by the seller to the 6purchaser at a point outside Illinois so that the sale is 7exempt under the United States Constitution as a sale in 8interstate or foreign commerce.9    Whenever the Department determines that a refund of money 10paid into the Local Government Tax Fund should be made to a 11claimant instead of issuing a credit memorandum, the 12Department shall notify the State Comptroller, who shall cause 13the order to be drawn for the amount specified, and to the 14person named, in such notification from the Department. Such 15refund shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of the Local 16Government Tax Fund.17    As soon as possible after the first day of each month, 18beginning January 1, 2011, upon certification of the 19Department of Revenue, the Comptroller shall order 20transferred, and the Treasurer shall transfer, to the STAR 21Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales tax increment, as defined 22in the Innovation Development and Economy Act, collected 23during the second preceding calendar month for sales within a 24STAR bond district and deposited into the Local Government Tax 25Fund, less 3% of that amount, which shall be transferred into 26the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund and shall be used   SB1673- 4 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1by the Department, subject to appropriation, to cover the 2costs of the Department in administering the Innovation 3Development and Economy Act. 4    After the monthly transfer to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, 5on or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 6Department shall prepare and certify to the Comptroller the 7disbursement of stated sums of money to named municipalities 8and counties, the municipalities and counties to be those 9entitled to distribution of taxes or penalties paid to the 10Department during the second preceding calendar month. The 11amount to be paid to each municipality or county shall be the 12amount (not including credit memoranda) collected during the 13second preceding calendar month by the Department and paid 14into the Local Government Tax Fund, plus an amount the 15Department determines is necessary to offset any amounts which 16were erroneously paid to a different taxing body, and not 17including an amount equal to the amount of refunds made during 18the second preceding calendar month by the Department, and not 19including any amount which the Department determines is 20necessary to offset any amounts which are payable to a 21different taxing body but were erroneously paid to the 22municipality or county, and not including any amounts that are 23transferred to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund. Within 10 days 24after receipt, by the Comptroller, of the disbursement 25certification to the municipalities and counties, provided for 26in this Section to be given to the Comptroller by the   SB1673- 5 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1Department, the Comptroller shall cause the orders to be drawn 2for the respective amounts in accordance with the directions 3contained in such certification.4    When certifying the amount of monthly disbursement to a 5municipality or county under this Section, the Department 6shall increase or decrease that amount by an amount necessary 7to offset any misallocation of previous disbursements. The 8offset amount shall be the amount erroneously disbursed within 9the 6 months preceding the time a misallocation is discovered.10    The provisions directing the distributions from the 11special fund in the State treasury provided for in this 12Section shall constitute an irrevocable and continuing 13appropriation of all amounts as provided herein. The State 14Treasurer and State Comptroller are hereby authorized to make 15distributions as provided in this Section.16    In construing any development, redevelopment, annexation, 17preannexation, or other lawful agreement in effect prior to 18September 1, 1990, which describes or refers to receipts from 19a county or municipal retailers' occupation tax, use tax or 20service occupation tax which now cannot be imposed, such 21description or reference shall be deemed to include the 22replacement revenue for such abolished taxes, distributed from 23the Local Government Tax Fund.24    As soon as possible after March 8, 2013 (the effective 25date of Public Act 98-3), the State Comptroller shall order 26and the State Treasurer shall transfer $6,600,000 from the   SB1673- 6 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1Local Government Tax Fund to the Illinois State Medical 2Disciplinary Fund. 3(Source: P.A. 102-700, Article 60, Section 60-10, eff. 44-19-22; 102-700, Article 65, Section 65-15, eff. 4-19-22; 5103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-20)  (from Ch. 127, par. 142z-20)7    Sec. 6z-20. County and Mass Transit District Fund. Of the 8money received from the 6.25% general rate (and, beginning 9July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, the 1.25% rate on 10motor fuel and gasohol, and beginning on August 6, 2010 11through August 15, 2010, and beginning again on August 5, 2022 12through August 14, 2022, and beginning again from August 6, 132025 through August 11, 2025, and from August 13, 2025 through 14August 15, 2025, the 1.25% rate on sales tax holiday items) on 15sales subject to taxation under the Retailers' Occupation Tax 16Act and Service Occupation Tax Act and paid into the County and 17Mass Transit District Fund, distribution to the Regional 18Transportation Authority tax fund, created pursuant to Section 194.03 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act, for deposit 20therein shall be made based upon the retail sales occurring in 21a county having more than 3,000,000 inhabitants. The remainder 22shall be distributed to each county having 3,000,000 or fewer 23inhabitants based upon the retail sales occurring in each such 24county.25    For the purpose of determining allocation to the local   SB1673- 7 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1government unit, a retail sale by a producer of coal or other 2mineral mined in Illinois is a sale at retail at the place 3where the coal or other mineral mined in Illinois is extracted 4from the earth. This paragraph does not apply to coal or other 5mineral when it is delivered or shipped by the seller to the 6purchaser at a point outside Illinois so that the sale is 7exempt under the United States Constitution as a sale in 8interstate or foreign commerce.9    Of the money received from the 6.25% general use tax rate 10on tangible personal property which is purchased outside 11Illinois at retail from a retailer and which is titled or 12registered by any agency of this State's government and paid 13into the County and Mass Transit District Fund, the amount for 14which Illinois addresses for titling or registration purposes 15are given as being in each county having more than 3,000,000 16inhabitants shall be distributed into the Regional 17Transportation Authority tax fund, created pursuant to Section 184.03 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act. The 19remainder of the money paid from such sales shall be 20distributed to each county based on sales for which Illinois 21addresses for titling or registration purposes are given as 22being located in the county. Any money paid into the Regional 23Transportation Authority Occupation and Use Tax Replacement 24Fund from the County and Mass Transit District Fund prior to 25January 14, 1991, which has not been paid to the Authority 26prior to that date, shall be transferred to the Regional   SB1673- 8 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1Transportation Authority tax fund.2    Whenever the Department determines that a refund of money 3paid into the County and Mass Transit District Fund should be 4made to a claimant instead of issuing a credit memorandum, the 5Department shall notify the State Comptroller, who shall cause 6the order to be drawn for the amount specified, and to the 7person named, in such notification from the Department. Such 8refund shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of the County 9and Mass Transit District Fund.10    As soon as possible after the first day of each month, 11beginning January 1, 2011, upon certification of the 12Department of Revenue, the Comptroller shall order 13transferred, and the Treasurer shall transfer, to the STAR 14Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales tax increment, as defined 15in the Innovation Development and Economy Act, collected 16during the second preceding calendar month for sales within a 17STAR bond district and deposited into the County and Mass 18Transit District Fund, less 3% of that amount, which shall be 19transferred into the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund 20and shall be used by the Department, subject to appropriation, 21to cover the costs of the Department in administering the 22Innovation Development and Economy Act. 23    After the monthly transfer to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, 24on or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 25Department shall prepare and certify to the Comptroller the 26disbursement of stated sums of money to the Regional   SB1673- 9 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1Transportation Authority and to named counties, the counties 2to be those entitled to distribution, as hereinabove provided, 3of taxes or penalties paid to the Department during the second 4preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to the 5Regional Transportation Authority and each county having 63,000,000 or fewer inhabitants shall be the amount (not 7including credit memoranda) collected during the second 8preceding calendar month by the Department and paid into the 9County and Mass Transit District Fund, plus an amount the 10Department determines is necessary to offset any amounts which 11were erroneously paid to a different taxing body, and not 12including an amount equal to the amount of refunds made during 13the second preceding calendar month by the Department, and not 14including any amount which the Department determines is 15necessary to offset any amounts which were payable to a 16different taxing body but were erroneously paid to the 17Regional Transportation Authority or county, and not including 18any amounts that are transferred to the STAR Bonds Revenue 19Fund, less 1.5% of the amount to be paid to the Regional 20Transportation Authority, which shall be transferred into the 21Tax Compliance and Administration Fund. The Department, at the 22time of each monthly disbursement to the Regional 23Transportation Authority, shall prepare and certify to the 24State Comptroller the amount to be transferred into the Tax 25Compliance and Administration Fund under this Section. Within 2610 days after receipt, by the Comptroller, of the disbursement   SB1673- 10 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1certification to the Regional Transportation Authority, 2counties, and the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund 3provided for in this Section to be given to the Comptroller by 4the Department, the Comptroller shall cause the orders to be 5drawn for the respective amounts in accordance with the 6directions contained in such certification.7    When certifying the amount of a monthly disbursement to 8the Regional Transportation Authority or to a county under 9this Section, the Department shall increase or decrease that 10amount by an amount necessary to offset any misallocation of 11previous disbursements. The offset amount shall be the amount 12erroneously disbursed within the 6 months preceding the time a 13misallocation is discovered.14    The provisions directing the distributions from the 15special fund in the State Treasury provided for in this 16Section and from the Regional Transportation Authority tax 17fund created by Section 4.03 of the Regional Transportation 18Authority Act shall constitute an irrevocable and continuing 19appropriation of all amounts as provided herein. The State 20Treasurer and State Comptroller are hereby authorized to make 21distributions as provided in this Section.22    In construing any development, redevelopment, annexation, 23preannexation or other lawful agreement in effect prior to 24September 1, 1990, which describes or refers to receipts from 25a county or municipal retailers' occupation tax, use tax or 26service occupation tax which now cannot be imposed, such   SB1673- 11 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1description or reference shall be deemed to include the 2replacement revenue for such abolished taxes, distributed from 3the County and Mass Transit District Fund or Local Government 4Distributive Fund, as the case may be.5(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22.) 6    Section 10. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 73-10 as follows: 8    (35 ILCS 105/3-10)9    Sec. 3-10. Rate of tax. Unless otherwise provided in this 10Section, the tax imposed by this Act is at the rate of 6.25% of 11either the selling price or the fair market value, if any, of 12the tangible personal property, which, on and after January 1, 132025, includes leases of tangible personal property. In all 14cases where property functionally used or consumed is the same 15as the property that was purchased at retail, then the tax is 16imposed on the selling price of the property. In all cases 17where property functionally used or consumed is a by-product 18or waste product that has been refined, manufactured, or 19produced from property purchased at retail, then the tax is 20imposed on the lower of the fair market value, if any, of the 21specific property so used in this State or on the selling price 22of the property purchased at retail. For purposes of this 23Section "fair market value" means the price at which property 24would change hands between a willing buyer and a willing   SB1673- 12 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or sell and 2both having reasonable knowledge of the relevant facts. The 3fair market value shall be established by Illinois sales by 4the taxpayer of the same property as that functionally used or 5consumed, or if there are no such sales by the taxpayer, then 6comparable sales or purchases of property of like kind and 7character in Illinois.8    Beginning on July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, 9with respect to motor fuel, as defined in Section 1.1 of the 10Motor Fuel Tax Law, and gasohol, as defined in Section 3-40 of 11the Use Tax Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%.12    Beginning on August 6, 2010 through August 15, 2010, and 13beginning again on August 5, 2022 through August 14, 2022, and 14beginning again from August 6, 2025 through August 8, 2025 and 15from August 13, 2025 through August 15, 2025, with respect to 16sales tax holiday items as defined in Section 3-6 of this Act, 17the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%. 18    With respect to gasohol, the tax imposed by this Act 19applies to (i) 70% of the proceeds of sales made on or after 20January 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, (ii) 80% of the 21proceeds of sales made on or after July 1, 2003 and on or 22before July 1, 2017, (iii) 100% of the proceeds of sales made 23after July 1, 2017 and prior to January 1, 2024, (iv) 90% of 24the proceeds of sales made on or after January 1, 2024 and on 25or before December 31, 2028, and (v) 100% of the proceeds of 26sales made after December 31, 2028. If, at any time, however,   SB1673- 13 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1the tax under this Act on sales of gasohol is imposed at the 2rate of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% 3of the proceeds of sales of gasohol made during that time.4    With respect to mid-range ethanol blends, the tax imposed 5by this Act applies to (i) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on 6or after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028 and 7(ii) 100% of the proceeds of sales made thereafter. If, at any 8time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of mid-range 9ethanol blends is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax 10imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales of 11mid-range ethanol blends made during that time. 12    With respect to majority blended ethanol fuel, the tax 13imposed by this Act does not apply to the proceeds of sales 14made on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 152028 but applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales made 16thereafter.17    With respect to biodiesel blends with no less than 1% and 18no more than 10% biodiesel, the tax imposed by this Act applies 19to (i) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on or after July 1, 202003 and on or before December 31, 2018 and (ii) 100% of the 21proceeds of sales made after December 31, 2018 and before 22January 1, 2024. On and after January 1, 2024 and on or before 23December 31, 2030, the taxation of biodiesel, renewable 24diesel, and biodiesel blends shall be as provided in Section 253-5.1. If, at any time, however, the tax under this Act on 26sales of biodiesel blends with no less than 1% and no more than   SB1673- 14 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b110% biodiesel is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax 2imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales of 3biodiesel blends with no less than 1% and no more than 10% 4biodiesel made during that time.5    With respect to biodiesel and biodiesel blends with more 6than 10% but no more than 99% biodiesel, the tax imposed by 7this Act does not apply to the proceeds of sales made on or 8after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 2023. On and 9after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 10taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 11shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1.12    Until July 1, 2022 and from July 1, 2023 through December 1331, 2025, with respect to food for human consumption that is to 14be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 15alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 16use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for 17immediate consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 1%. 18Beginning on July 1, 2022 and until July 1, 2023, with respect 19to food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 20premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 21food consisting of or infused with adult use cannabis, soft 22drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 23consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 0%. On and 24after January 1, 2026, food for human consumption that is to be 25consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 26alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult   SB1673- 15 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 2prepared for immediate consumption) is exempt from the tax 3imposed by this Act. 4    With respect to prescription and nonprescription 5medicines, drugs, medical appliances, products classified as 6Class III medical devices by the United States Food and Drug 7Administration that are used for cancer treatment pursuant to 8a prescription, as well as any accessories and components 9related to those devices, modifications to a motor vehicle for 10the purpose of rendering it usable by a person with a 11disability, and insulin, blood sugar testing materials, 12syringes, and needles used by human diabetics, the tax is 13imposed at the rate of 1%. For the purposes of this Section, 14until September 1, 2009: the term "soft drinks" means any 15complete, finished, ready-to-use, non-alcoholic drink, whether 16carbonated or not, including, but not limited to, soda water, 17cola, fruit juice, vegetable juice, carbonated water, and all 18other preparations commonly known as soft drinks of whatever 19kind or description that are contained in any closed or sealed 20bottle, can, carton, or container, regardless of size; but 21"soft drinks" does not include coffee, tea, non-carbonated 22water, infant formula, milk or milk products as defined in the 23Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk Products Act, or drinks 24containing 50% or more natural fruit or vegetable juice.25    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 26beginning September 1, 2009, "soft drinks" means non-alcoholic   SB1673- 16 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft 2drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk 3products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater 4than 50% of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.5    Until August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other 6provisions of this Act, "food for human consumption that is to 7be consumed off the premises where it is sold" includes all 8food sold through a vending machine, except soft drinks and 9food products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 10regardless of the location of the vending machine. Beginning 11August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other provisions of 12this Act, "food for human consumption that is to be consumed 13off the premises where it is sold" includes all food sold 14through a vending machine, except soft drinks, candy, and food 15products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 16regardless of the location of the vending machine. 17    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 18beginning September 1, 2009, "food for human consumption that 19is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold" does not 20include candy. For purposes of this Section, "candy" means a 21preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial 22sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or 23other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or 24pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation that contains 25flour or requires refrigeration. 26    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act,   SB1673- 17 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1beginning September 1, 2009, "nonprescription medicines and 2drugs" does not include grooming and hygiene products. For 3purposes of this Section, "grooming and hygiene products" 4includes, but is not limited to, soaps and cleaning solutions, 5shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan 6lotions and screens, unless those products are available by 7prescription only, regardless of whether the products meet the 8definition of "over-the-counter-drugs". For the purposes of 9this paragraph, "over-the-counter-drug" means a drug for human 10use that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug 11as required by 21 CFR 201.66. The "over-the-counter-drug" 12label includes: 13        (A) a "Drug Facts" panel; or14        (B) a statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a 15    list of those ingredients contained in the compound, 16    substance or preparation.17    Beginning on January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 18Act 98-122), "prescription and nonprescription medicines and 19drugs" includes medical cannabis purchased from a registered 20dispensing organization under the Compassionate Use of Medical 21Cannabis Program Act. 22    As used in this Section, "adult use cannabis" means 23cannabis subject to tax under the Cannabis Cultivation 24Privilege Tax Law and the Cannabis Purchaser Excise Tax Law 25and does not include cannabis subject to tax under the 26Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.   SB1673- 18 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1    If the property that is purchased at retail from a 2retailer is acquired outside Illinois and used outside 3Illinois before being brought to Illinois for use here and is 4taxable under this Act, the "selling price" on which the tax is 5computed shall be reduced by an amount that represents a 6reasonable allowance for depreciation for the period of prior 7out-of-state use. No depreciation is allowed in cases where 8the tax under this Act is imposed on lease receipts.9(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 102-700, Article 20, 10Section 20-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 60, Section 1160-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 65, Section 65-5, eff. 124-19-22; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-592, 13eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 15. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 15by changing Section 2-10 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 120/2-10)17    Sec. 2-10. Rate of tax. Unless otherwise provided in this 18Section, the tax imposed by this Act is at the rate of 6.25% of 19gross receipts from sales, which, on and after January 1, 202025, includes leases, of tangible personal property made in 21the course of business.22    Beginning on July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, 23with respect to motor fuel, as defined in Section 1.1 of the 24Motor Fuel Tax Law, and gasohol, as defined in Section 3-40 of   SB1673- 19 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1the Use Tax Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%.2    Beginning on August 6, 2010 through August 15, 2010, and 3beginning again on August 5, 2022 through August 14, 2022, and 4beginning again from August 6, 2025 through August 8, 2025 and 5from August 13, 2025 through August 15, 2025, with respect to 6sales tax holiday items as defined in Section 2-8 of this Act, 7the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%. 8    Within 14 days after July 1, 2000 (the effective date of 9Public Act 91-872), each retailer of motor fuel and gasohol 10shall cause the following notice to be posted in a prominently 11visible place on each retail dispensing device that is used to 12dispense motor fuel or gasohol in the State of Illinois: "As of 13July 1, 2000, the State of Illinois has eliminated the State's 14share of sales tax on motor fuel and gasohol through December 1531, 2000. The price on this pump should reflect the 16elimination of the tax." The notice shall be printed in bold 17print on a sign that is no smaller than 4 inches by 8 inches. 18The sign shall be clearly visible to customers. Any retailer 19who fails to post or maintain a required sign through December 2031, 2000 is guilty of a petty offense for which the fine shall 21be $500 per day per each retail premises where a violation 22occurs.23    With respect to gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax Act, the 24tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 70% of the proceeds of 25sales made on or after January 1, 1990, and before July 1, 262003, (ii) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on or after July   SB1673- 20 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b11, 2003 and on or before July 1, 2017, (iii) 100% of the 2proceeds of sales made after July 1, 2017 and prior to January 31, 2024, (iv) 90% of the proceeds of sales made on or after 4January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028, and (v) 5100% of the proceeds of sales made after December 31, 2028. If, 6at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 7gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax Act, is imposed at the rate 8of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of 9the proceeds of sales of gasohol made during that time.10    With respect to mid-range ethanol blends, as defined in 11Section 3-44.3 of the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act 12applies to (i) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on or after 13January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028 and (ii) 14100% of the proceeds of sales made after December 31, 2028. If, 15at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 16mid-range ethanol blends is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then 17the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of 18sales of mid-range ethanol blends made during that time. 19    With respect to majority blended ethanol fuel, as defined 20in the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act does not apply 21to the proceeds of sales made on or after July 1, 2003 and on 22or before December 31, 2028 but applies to 100% of the proceeds 23of sales made thereafter.24    With respect to biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use 25Tax Act, with no less than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel, 26the tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 80% of the proceeds   SB1673- 21 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1of sales made on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before 2December 31, 2018 and (ii) 100% of the proceeds of sales made 3after December 31, 2018 and before January 1, 2024. On and 4after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 5taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 6shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax Act. If, 7at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 8biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with no less 9than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel is imposed at the rate 10of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of 11the proceeds of sales of biodiesel blends with no less than 1% 12and no more than 10% biodiesel made during that time.13    With respect to biodiesel, as defined in the Use Tax Act, 14and biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with more 15than 10% but no more than 99% biodiesel, the tax imposed by 16this Act does not apply to the proceeds of sales made on or 17after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 2023. On and 18after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 19taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 20shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax Act. 21    Until July 1, 2022 and from July 1, 2023 through December 2231, 2025, with respect to food for human consumption that is to 23be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 24alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 25use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for 26immediate consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 1%.   SB1673- 22 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1Beginning July 1, 2022 and until July 1, 2023, with respect to 2food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 3premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 4food consisting of or infused with adult use cannabis, soft 5drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 6consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 0%. On and 7after January 1, 2026, food for human consumption that is to be 8consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 9alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 10use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 11prepared for immediate consumption) is exempt from the tax 12imposed by this Act. 13    With respect to prescription and nonprescription 14medicines, drugs, medical appliances, products classified as 15Class III medical devices by the United States Food and Drug 16Administration that are used for cancer treatment pursuant to 17a prescription, as well as any accessories and components 18related to those devices, modifications to a motor vehicle for 19the purpose of rendering it usable by a person with a 20disability, and insulin, blood sugar testing materials, 21syringes, and needles used by human diabetics, the tax is 22imposed at the rate of 1%. For the purposes of this Section, 23until September 1, 2009: the term "soft drinks" means any 24complete, finished, ready-to-use, non-alcoholic drink, whether 25carbonated or not, including, but not limited to, soda water, 26cola, fruit juice, vegetable juice, carbonated water, and all   SB1673- 23 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1other preparations commonly known as soft drinks of whatever 2kind or description that are contained in any closed or sealed 3bottle, can, carton, or container, regardless of size; but 4"soft drinks" does not include coffee, tea, non-carbonated 5water, infant formula, milk or milk products as defined in the 6Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk Products Act, or drinks 7containing 50% or more natural fruit or vegetable juice.8    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 9beginning September 1, 2009, "soft drinks" means non-alcoholic 10beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft 11drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk 12products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater 13than 50% of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.14    Until August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other 15provisions of this Act, "food for human consumption that is to 16be consumed off the premises where it is sold" includes all 17food sold through a vending machine, except soft drinks and 18food products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 19regardless of the location of the vending machine. Beginning 20August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other provisions of 21this Act, "food for human consumption that is to be consumed 22off the premises where it is sold" includes all food sold 23through a vending machine, except soft drinks, candy, and food 24products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 25regardless of the location of the vending machine. 26    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act,   SB1673- 24 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1beginning September 1, 2009, "food for human consumption that 2is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold" does not 3include candy. For purposes of this Section, "candy" means a 4preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial 5sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or 6other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or 7pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation that contains 8flour or requires refrigeration. 9    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 10beginning September 1, 2009, "nonprescription medicines and 11drugs" does not include grooming and hygiene products. For 12purposes of this Section, "grooming and hygiene products" 13includes, but is not limited to, soaps and cleaning solutions, 14shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan 15lotions and screens, unless those products are available by 16prescription only, regardless of whether the products meet the 17definition of "over-the-counter-drugs". For the purposes of 18this paragraph, "over-the-counter-drug" means a drug for human 19use that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug 20as required by 21 CFR 201.66. The "over-the-counter-drug" 21label includes: 22        (A) a "Drug Facts" panel; or23        (B) a statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a 24    list of those ingredients contained in the compound, 25    substance or preparation.26    Beginning on January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public   SB1673- 25 -LRB104 08295 HLH 18346 b1Act 98-122), "prescription and nonprescription medicines and 2drugs" includes medical cannabis purchased from a registered 3dispensing organization under the Compassionate Use of Medical 4Cannabis Program Act. 5    As used in this Section, "adult use cannabis" means 6cannabis subject to tax under the Cannabis Cultivation 7Privilege Tax Law and the Cannabis Purchaser Excise Tax Law 8and does not include cannabis subject to tax under the 9Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. 10(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 102-700, Article 20, 11Section 20-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 60, Section 1260-30, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 65, Section 65-10, eff. 134-19-22; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-592, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; revised 11-26-24.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.